Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 2. Insurance Producers

§ 26-9-201.
Purpose and scope.

This chapter governs the qualifications and procedures for the licensing of insurance producers. This chapter does not apply to excess and surplus lines brokers licensed pursuant to W.S.

26-11-112

except as provided in W.S. 26-9-207(b), 26-9-207(c), 26-9-207(g),

26-9-208

and

26-9-230

or as expressly provided in chapter 11 of this code.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1; 2011, ch. 60, § 2; 2012, ch. 37, § 2.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “W.S. 26-9-207(b), 26-9-207(c)” for “W.S. 26-9-207(h).”

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “26-9-207(g),

26-9-208

and

26-9-230

” for “and

26-9-208

.”

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2022 amendment,

effective January 1, 2023, substituted “through (d), (f) and (g)” for “26-9-207(c), 26-9-207(g),” added “26-9-216,” and made a related change.

§ 26-9-201.
Purpose and scope. [Effective January 1, 2023]

This chapter governs the qualifications and procedures for the licensing of insurance producers. This chapter does not apply to excess and surplus lines brokers licensed pursuant to W.S.

26-11-112

except as provided in W.S. 26-9-207(b) through (d), (f) and (g),

26-9-208

,

26-9-216

and

26-9-230

or as expressly provided in chapter 11 of this code.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1; 2011, ch. 60, § 2; 2012, ch. 37, § 2; 2022 ch. 46, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

§ 26-9-202.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Business entity” means a corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership or other legal entity;

“Endorsee” means an employee or representative of a specialty limited lines producer;

“Home state” means the District of Columbia and any state or territory of the United States in which an insurance producer maintains his principal place of residence or principal place of business and is licensed to act as an insurance producer;

“License” means a document issued by the commissioner authorizing a person to act as an insurance producer for the lines of authority specified in the document. The license itself does not create any authority, actual, apparent or inherent, in the holder to represent or commit an insurer;

“Limited line credit insurance” includes credit life, credit disability, credit property, credit unemployment, involuntary unemployment, mortgage life, mortgage guaranty, mortgage disability, guaranteed automobile protection insurance, and any other form of insurance offered in connection with an extension of credit that is limited to partially or wholly extinguishing that credit obligation that the commissioner determines should be designated a form of limited line credit insurance;

“Limited line credit insurance producer” means a person who sells, solicits or negotiates one (1) or more forms of limited line credit insurance coverage to individuals through a master, corporate, group or individual policy;

“Limited lines insurance” means those lines of insurance referred to in paragraph (xxi) of this subsection and W.S.

26-9-234

,

26-32-101

, 26-37-102(a)(iv) or any other line of insurance the commissioner deems necessary to recognize for the purposes of complying with W.S. 26-9-208(e);

“Limited lines producer” means a person authorized by the commissioner to sell, solicit or negotiate limited lines insurance;

“Location” means any physical location in the state of Wyoming or any website, call center site or similar location directed to residents of the state of Wyoming;

“Negotiate” means the act of conferring directly with or offering advice directly to a purchaser or prospective purchaser of a particular contract of insurance concerning any of the substantive benefits, terms or conditions of the contract, provided that the person engaged in that act either sells insurance or obtains insurance from insurers for purchasers;

“Portable electronic device insurance” means insurance which may be offered on a month to month or other periodic basis as a group or master property and casualty insurance policy providing coverage for the repair or replacement of portable electronic devices which may provide coverage for portable electronic devices against any one (1) or more of the following causes of loss: loss, theft, inoperability due to mechanical failure, malfunction, damage or other similar causes of loss. For purposes of this title, with respect to portable electronic device insurance, property and casualty insurance shall be deemed to include inland marine insurance. Portable electronic device insurance does not include a service contract as defined in chapter 49 of this title;

“Rental car insurance” means insurance offered, sold or solicited in connection with and incidental to the rental of rental cars, whether at the rental office or by preselection of coverage in master, corporate, group or individual agreements that is nontransferable, applies only to the rental car that is the subject of the rental agreement and is limited to the following kinds of insurance and shall not include the rental car company’s agreement to waive its right of indemnity against a renter for damages to the rental vehicle:

Personal accident insurance for renters and other rental car occupants, for accidental death or dismemberment and for medical expenses resulting from an accident that occurs with the rental car during the rental period;

Liability insurance, which at the exclusive option of the rental car company, may include uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage, whether offered separately or in combination with other liability insurance, that provides protection to the renters and to other authorized drivers of a rental car for liability arising from the operation of the rental car during the rental period;

Personal effects insurance that provides coverage to renters and other vehicle occupants for loss of or damage to, personal effects in the rental car during the rental period;

Roadside assistance and emergency sickness protection insurance; or

Any other insurance product sold incidental to the rental transaction.

“Sell” means to exchange a contract of insurance by any means, for money or its equivalent, on behalf of an insurer;

“Solicit” means attempting to sell insurance or asking or urging a person to apply for a particular kind of insurance from a particular insurer;

“Specialty limited lines insurance” means insurance offered or disseminated in connection with and ancillary to a specialty limited lines producer’s core business. The term includes the following types of insurance: rental car insurance, portable electronic device insurance, travel insurance and any other line of insurance the commissioner deems necessary;

“Specialty limited lines producer” means a person or business entity licensed as a limited lines producer and qualified to offer, sell or solicit specialty limited lines insurance;

“Terminate” means the cancellation of the relationship between an insurance producer and the insurer or the termination of a producer’s authority to transact insurance;

“Travel insurance” means insurance coverage for personal risks incident to planned travel, including but not limited to interruption or cancellation of trip or event, loss of baggage or personal effects, damages to accommodations or rental vehicles, and sickness, accident, disability or death occurring during travel, and does not include major medical plans, which provide comprehensive medical protection for travelers with trips lasting six (6) months or longer;

“Uniform application” means the current version of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ uniform application for resident and nonresident producer licensing;

“Uniform business entity application” means the current version of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ uniform business entity application for resident and nonresident business entities;

“Crop insurance” means insurance providing protection against damage to crops from unfavorable weather conditions, fire, lightning, flood, hail, insect infestation, disease or other yield-reducing conditions or perils provided by the private insurance market or that is provided by the federal crop insurance corporation, including multi-peril crop and protection of revenue from adverse market fluctuation insurance;

“Adjuster” means any individual who either investigates and negotiates settlements relative to insurance claims or applies the factual circumstances of an insurance claim to the insurance policy provisions, or both, arising under property and casualty insurance contracts. An attorney-at-law who is licensed to practice law in this state or a licensed agent or broker who adjusts or assists in adjustment of losses arising under policies issued through that broker or by the insurer represented by that agent, is not an adjuster for the purposes of this chapter. An appraiser or umpire is not an adjuster for the purposes of this chapter;

“Appraiser” means a person selected by the insurer or the insured to place a value on or estimate the amount of loss pursuant to an insurance claim. An appraiser does not negotiate settlements relative to insurance claims or apply the factual circumstances of an insurance claim to the insurance policy provisions;

“Umpire” means a person selected by the appraisers representing the insurer and the insured or, if the appraisers cannot agree, by the court or hearing officer charged with resolving issues that the appraisers are unable to agree upon during the appraisal.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1; 2011, ch. 60, § 2; 2013 ch. 123, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 15, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(vi), deleted “26-29-233” after “26-9-221,” and added “26-50-103” after “26-37-102(a)(iv).”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(ii), (ix), (xi), (xii), (xv), (xvi), and (xviii), and renumbered subsections accordingly; and revised the list of references in (a)(vii).

The 2017 amendment,

in (a)(vii), deleted “26-9-221” preceding “26-9-234,” and inserted “26-32-101”; and added (a)(xxi).

The 2022 amendments. —

The first 2022 amendment, by ch. 46, § 1, added (a)(xxv) through (a)(xxvii).

Laws 2022, ch. 46, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.

The second 2022 amendment, by ch. 46, § 2, effective January 1, 2023, added (a)(xxii) through (a)(xxiv).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-9-202.
Definitions. [Effective January 1, 2023]

As used in this chapter:

“Business entity” means a corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership or other legal entity;

“Endorsee” means an employee or representative of a specialty limited lines producer;

“Home state” means the District of Columbia and any state or territory of the United States in which an insurance producer maintains his principal place of residence or principal place of business and is licensed to act as an insurance producer;

“License” means a document issued by the commissioner authorizing a person to act as an insurance producer for the lines of authority specified in the document. The license itself does not create any authority, actual, apparent or inherent, in the holder to represent or commit an insurer;

“Limited line credit insurance” includes credit life, credit disability, credit property, credit unemployment, involuntary unemployment, mortgage life, mortgage guaranty, mortgage disability, guaranteed automobile protection insurance, and any other form of insurance offered in connection with an extension of credit that is limited to partially or wholly extinguishing that credit obligation that the commissioner determines should be designated a form of limited line credit insurance;

“Limited line credit insurance producer” means a person who sells, solicits or negotiates one (1) or more forms of limited line credit insurance coverage to individuals through a master, corporate, group or individual policy;

“Limited lines insurance” means those lines of insurance referred to in paragraph (xxi) of this subsection and W.S.

26-9-234

,

26-32-101

, 26-37-102(a)(iv) or any other line of insurance the commissioner deems necessary to recognize for the purposes of complying with W.S. 26-9-208(e);

“Limited lines producer” means a person authorized by the commissioner to sell, solicit or negotiate limited lines insurance;

“Location” means any physical location in the state of Wyoming or any website, call center site or similar location directed to residents of the state of Wyoming;

“Negotiate” means the act of conferring directly with or offering advice directly to a purchaser or prospective purchaser of a particular contract of insurance concerning any of the substantive benefits, terms or conditions of the contract, provided that the person engaged in that act either sells insurance or obtains insurance from insurers for purchasers;

“Portable electronic device insurance” means insurance which may be offered on a month to month or other periodic basis as a group or master property and casualty insurance policy providing coverage for the repair or replacement of portable electronic devices which may provide coverage for portable electronic devices against any one (1) or more of the following causes of loss: loss, theft, inoperability due to mechanical failure, malfunction, damage or other similar causes of loss. For purposes of this title, with respect to portable electronic device insurance, property and casualty insurance shall be deemed to include inland marine insurance. Portable electronic device insurance does not include a service contract as defined in chapter 49 of this title;

“Rental car insurance” means insurance offered, sold or solicited in connection with and incidental to the rental of rental cars, whether at the rental office or by preselection of coverage in master, corporate, group or individual agreements that is nontransferable, applies only to the rental car that is the subject of the rental agreement and is limited to the following kinds of insurance and shall not include the rental car company’s agreement to waive its right of indemnity against a renter for damages to the rental vehicle:

Personal accident insurance for renters and other rental car occupants, for accidental death or dismemberment and for medical expenses resulting from an accident that occurs with the rental car during the rental period;

Liability insurance, which at the exclusive option of the rental car company, may include uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage, whether offered separately or in combination with other liability insurance, that provides protection to the renters and to other authorized drivers of a rental car for liability arising from the operation of the rental car during the rental period;

Personal effects insurance that provides coverage to renters and other vehicle occupants for loss of or damage to, personal effects in the rental car during the rental period;

Roadside assistance and emergency sickness protection insurance; or

Any other insurance product sold incidental to the rental transaction.

“Sell” means to exchange a contract of insurance by any means, for money or its equivalent, on behalf of an insurer;

“Solicit” means attempting to sell insurance or asking or urging a person to apply for a particular kind of insurance from a particular insurer;

“Specialty limited lines insurance” means insurance offered or disseminated in connection with and ancillary to a specialty limited lines producer’s core business. The term includes the following types of insurance: rental car insurance, portable electronic device insurance, travel insurance and any other line of insurance the commissioner deems necessary;

“Specialty limited lines producer” means a person or business entity licensed as a limited lines producer and qualified to offer, sell or solicit specialty limited lines insurance;

“Terminate” means the cancellation of the relationship between an insurance producer and the insurer or the termination of a producer’s authority to transact insurance;

“Travel insurance” means insurance coverage for personal risks incident to planned travel, including but not limited to interruption or cancellation of trip or event, loss of baggage or personal effects, damages to accommodations or rental vehicles, and sickness, accident, disability or death occurring during travel, and does not include major medical plans, which provide comprehensive medical protection for travelers with trips lasting six (6) months or longer;

“Uniform application” means the current version of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ uniform application for resident and nonresident producer licensing;

“Uniform business entity application” means the current version of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ uniform business entity application for resident and nonresident business entities;

“Crop insurance” means insurance providing protection against damage to crops from unfavorable weather conditions, fire, lightning, flood, hail, insect infestation, disease or other yield-reducing conditions or perils provided by the private insurance market or that is provided by the federal crop insurance corporation, including multi-peril crop and protection of revenue from adverse market fluctuation insurance;

“Continuing education provider” means any person approved by the commissioner to offer continuing education courses to persons licensed in this state;

“Public adjuster” means any person who, for compensation or any other thing of value, acts on behalf of an insured by doing any of the following:

Acting for or aiding an insured in negotiating for or in effecting the settlement of a first party claim for loss or damage to real or personal property of the insured;

Advertising for employment as a public adjuster of first party claims or otherwise soliciting business or representing to the public that the person is a public adjuster of first party claims for loss or damage to real or personal property of an insured;

Directly or indirectly soliciting the business of investigating or adjusting losses, or of advising an insured about first party claims for loss or damage to real or personal property of the insured.

“Licensee” means any person granted a license under this chapter;

“Adjuster” means any individual who either investigates and negotiates settlements relative to insurance claims or applies the factual circumstances of an insurance claim to the insurance policy provisions, or both, arising under property and casualty insurance contracts. An attorney-at-law who is licensed to practice law in this state or a licensed agent or broker who adjusts or assists in adjustment of losses arising under policies issued through that broker or by the insurer represented by that agent, is not an adjuster for the purposes of this chapter. An appraiser or umpire is not an adjuster for the purposes of this chapter;

“Appraiser” means a person selected by the insurer or the insured to place a value on or estimate the amount of loss pursuant to an insurance claim. An appraiser does not negotiate settlements relative to insurance claims or apply the factual circumstances of an insurance claim to the insurance policy provisions;

“Umpire” means a person selected by the appraisers representing the insurer and the insured or, if the appraisers cannot agree, by the court or hearing officer charged with resolving issues that the appraisers are unable to agree upon during the appraisal.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1; 2011, ch. 60, § 2; 2013 ch. 123, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 15, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2022 ch. 46, § 1, effective March 9, 2022; 2022 ch. 46, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

§ 26-9-203.
License required.

A person shall not sell, solicit or negotiate insurance in this state for any class or classes of insurance unless the person is licensed for that line of authority in accordance with this chapter.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to surplus line broker's license, see §§

26-11-112

,

26-11-113

.

As to annual license for fraternal benefit societies, see §

26-29-227

.

As to licensing of foreign or alien fraternal benefit societies, see §

26-29-229

.

As to licensing of agents of fraternal benefit societies, see §

26-29-233

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of insurance agent or broker on ground of inadequacy of liability insurance coverage procured, 60 ALR5th 165.

§ 26-9-204.
Exceptions to licensing.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require an insurer to obtain an insurance producer license. As used in this section, the term “insurer” does not include an insurer’s officers, directors, employees, subsidiaries or affiliates.

A license as an insurance producer shall not be required of the following:

An officer, director or employee of an insurer or of an insurance producer, provided that the officer, director or employee does not receive any commission on policies written or sold to insure risks residing, located or to be performed in this state, and:

The officer, director or employee’s activities are executive, administrative, managerial, clerical or a combination of these, and are only indirectly related to the sale, solicitation or negotiation of insurance; or

The officer, director or employee’s function relates to underwriting, loss control, inspection or the processing, adjusting, investigating or settling of a claim on a contract of insurance; or

The officer, director or employee is acting in the capacity of a special agent or agency supervisor assisting insurance producers where the person’s activities are limited to providing technical advice and assistance to licensed insurance producers and do not include the sale, solicitation or negotiation of insurance.

A person who receives no commission and provides the following services:

Secures and furnishes information for the purpose of group life insurance, group property and casualty insurance, group annuities, group or blanket accident and health or disability insurance; or

Secures and furnishes information for the purpose of enrolling individuals under plans, issuing certificates under plans or otherwise assisting in administering plans; or

Performs administrative services related to mass marketed property and casualty insurance.

An employer or association or its officers, directors, employees, or the trustees of an employee trust plan, to the extent that the employers, officers, employees, directors or trustees are engaged in the administration or operation of a program of employee benefits for the employer’s or association’s own employees or the employees of its subsidiaries or affiliates, which program involves the use of insurance issued by an insurer, as long as the employers, associations, officers, directors, employees or trustees are not in any manner compensated, directly or indirectly, by the company issuing the contracts;

Employees of insurers or organizations employed by insurers who are engaging in the inspection, rating or classification of risks, or in the supervision of the training of insurance producers and who are not individually engaged in the sale, solicitation or negotiation of insurance;

A person whose activities in this state are limited to advertising without the intent to solicit insurance in this state through communications in printed publications or other forms of electronic mass media whose distribution is not limited to residents of the state, provided that the person does not sell, solicit or negotiate insurance that would insure risks residing, located or to be performed in this state;

A person who is not a resident of this state who sells, solicits or negotiates a contract of insurance for commercial property and casualty risks to an insured with risks located in more than one (1) state insured under that contract, provided that person is otherwise licensed as an insurance producer to sell, solicit or negotiate the insurance in the state where the insured maintains its principal place of business and the contract of insurance insures risks located in that state; or

A salaried full-time employee who counsels or advises his employer relative to the insurance interests of the employer or of the subsidiaries or business affiliates of the employer provided the employee does not sell or solicit insurance or receive a commission.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 26-9-205.
Application for examination.

A resident individual applying for an insurance producer license shall pass a written examination unless exempt pursuant to W.S.

26-9-209

. The examination shall test the knowledge of the individual concerning the lines of authority for which application is made, the duties and responsibilities of an insurance producer and the insurance laws and regulations of this state. Examinations required by this section shall be developed and conducted by the commissioner who may promulgate appropriate rules and regulations on the administration of examinations.

The commissioner may make arrangements, including contracting with an outside testing service, for administering examinations. If an outside testing service is employed, each individual applying for an examination shall remit the appropriate fee for the examination to the testing service.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1; 2017 ch. 9, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “may promulgate appropriate rules and regulations on the administration of examina- tions” for “shall adhere to the applicable instructions or recommendations of the state board of insurance agents’ examiners as provided by W.S.

26-10-104

”; and in (b), deleted “and the state board of insurance agents’ examiners” preceding “may make arrange- ments.”

Cross references. —

For provisions as to State Board of Insurance Agent Examiners, see §§

26-10-101

through

26-10-109

.

§ 26-9-206.
Application for license.

A person applying for a resident insurance producer license shall make application to the commissioner on the uniform application and declare under penalty of refusal, suspension or revocation of the license that the statements made in the application are true, correct and complete to the best of the individual’s knowledge and belief. Before approving the application, the commissioner shall find that the individual:

Is at least eighteen (18) years of age;

Has not committed any act that is a ground for denial, suspension or revocation set forth in W.S.

26-9-211

;

Has paid the fees set forth in W.S. 26-4-101(a);

Has successfully passed the examinations for the lines of authority for which the person has applied; and

Has provided the commissioner fingerprints and other information and permission necessary for a criminal history record background check as provided in W.S. 7-19-201(a). The cost of the criminal history record background check shall be paid by the applicant.

A business entity acting as an insurance producer is required to obtain an insurance producer license. Application shall be made using the uniform business entity application. Before approving the application, the commissioner shall find that:

The business entity has paid the fees set forth in W.S. 26-4-101(a); and

The business entity has designated a licensed producer responsible for the business entity’s compliance with the insurance laws, rules and regulations of this state.

The commissioner may require any documents reasonably necessary to verify the information contained in an application.

Each insurer that sells, solicits or negotiates any form of limited line credit insurance shall provide to each individual whose duties will include selling, soliciting or negotiating limited line credit insurance a program of instruction.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1; 2011, ch. 55, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, rewrote (a)(v), which formerly read: “Has provided the commissioner a credit and investigation report on the applicant from a recognized and established independent investigation and reporting agency. The cost of the report shall be paid by the applicant.”

§ 26-9-207.
License. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Unless denied licensure pursuant to W.S.

26-9-211

, persons who have met the requirements of W.S.

26-9-205

and

26-9-206

shall be issued an insurance producer license. An insurance producer may receive qualification for a license in one (1) or more of the following lines of authority:

Life — insurance coverage on human lives including benefits of endowment and annuities, and may include benefits in the event of death or dismemberment by accident and benefits for disability income;

Accident and health or sickness or disability — insurance coverage for sickness, bodily injury or accidental death and may include benefits for disability income;

Property — insurance coverage for the direct or consequential loss or damage to property of every kind;

Casualty — insurance coverage against legal liability, including that for death, injury or disability or damage to real or personal property;

Variable life and variable annuity products — insurance coverage provided under variable life insurance contracts and variable annuities;

Personal lines — property and casualty insurance coverage sold to individuals and families for primarily noncommercial purposes;

Credit — limited line credit insurance;

Any other line of insurance permitted under state laws or regulations.

An individual insurance producer, adjuster or surplus lines broker license shall remain in effect unless revoked or suspended if on or before the last day of the month of the licensee’s birthday in the second year following the issuance or renewal of the license the continuation fee set forth in W.S. 26-4-101(a) is paid, the continuing education requirements are met by the due date, a written request for continuation of the license is made to the commissioner on forms prescribed by the commissioner and the licensee remains in compliance with all other applicable provisions of this code. An insurance producer or surplus lines broker license issued to a business entity shall remain in effect unless revoked or suspended if on or before the last day of the month in which the license was effective in the second year following the issuance or renewal of the license the continuation fee set forth in W.S. 26-4-101(a) is paid, a written request for continuation of the license is made to the commissioner on forms prescribed by the commissioner and the licensee remains in compliance with all other applicable provisions of this code.

An individual insurance producer, adjuster or surplus lines broker who allows his license to lapse may, within twelve (12) months from the due date of the continuation fee, reinstate the same license without the necessity of passing a written examination. However, a penalty equal to the amount of the continuation fee shall be required in addition to the continuation fee for any continuation request received after the due date. A business entity insurance producer or surplus lines broker that allows its license to lapse may, within twelve (12) months from the due date of the continuation fee, reinstate the same license, however, a penalty equal to the amount of the continuation fee shall be required in addition to the continuation fee for any continuation request received after the due date.

A licensed insurance producer who is unable to comply with license renewal procedures due to military service or some other extenuating circumstance such as a long-term medical disability may request a waiver of those procedures. The producer may also request a waiver of any examination requirement or any other fine or sanction imposed for failure to comply with renewal procedures.

The license shall contain the licensee’s name, address, personal identification number, date of issuance, the lines of authority, the expiration date and any other information the commissioner deems necessary.

Licensees shall inform the commissioner by any means acceptable to the commissioner of a change of name, address, telephone number or other contact information as defined by rule and regulation of the commissioner within thirty (30) days of the change.

The commissioner may contract with nongovernmental entities, including the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or any affiliates or subsidiaries that association oversees, to perform any ministerial functions, including the collection of fees, related to licensing that the commissioner and the nongovernmental entity may deem appropriate.

and (j) Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 60, § 3.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1; 2004, ch. 7, § 1; 2011, ch. 60, §§ 2, 3; 2012, ch. 37, § 2; 2017 ch. 15, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, deleted “annual” or a variant preceding “continuation fee” or “continuation request” throughout the section; in (b) and the introductory paragraph of (h), substituted “the last day of the month of the licensee's birthday in the second year following the issuance or renewal of the license” for “March 31”; in (b), inserted “individual” preceding “insurance producer”; and in (j), substituted “its renewal date” for “March 31.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added “adjuster or surplus lines broker” in (b) and (c); in (b), deleted “for resident individual producers” after “education requirements”; in (c), deleted “unpaid” after “amount of the,” and substituted “continuation fee” for “unpaid fee” after “addition to the”; and repealed former (h) and (j) which read: “Each service representative, adjuster and surplus line broker license issued under this code shall continue in force until expired, suspended, revoked or otherwise terminated, if the applicable continuation fee specified in W.S.

26-4-101

is paid to the commissioner, on or before the last day of the month of the licensee's birthday in the second year following the issuance or renewal of the license, accompanied by a written request for continuation made as follows: (i) As to adjuster and surplus line broker licenses, request made and signed by the licensee; (ii) As to service representative licenses, request made and signed by the employer as to whom licensed.
(j) Any license referred to in subsection (h) of this section is considered expired if the commissioner does not receive the fee and the request for continuation by midnight on its renewal date, except that any holder of such a license who allows his license to lapse may, within twelve (12) months from the due date of the continuation fee, reinstate the same license without the necessity of passing a written examination. However, a penalty equal to the amount of the unpaid continuation fee shall be required in addition to the unpaid fee for any continuation request received after the due date.”

The 2012 amendment,

added “or surplus lines broker” in (g).

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (f), inserted “name,” and inserted “telephone number or other contact information as defined by rule and regulation of the commissioner”; and in (g), deleted “producer or surplus lines broker” preceding “licensing that the.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019,
in (b), substituted "if" for "as long as", added a comma after "date", deleted "and" and added "and the licensee remains in compliance with all other applicable provisions of this code." in the first sentence, added second sentence "An insurance producer or surplus lines broker license issued to a business entity shall remain in effect unless revoked or suspended if on or before the last day of the month in which the license was effective in the second year following the issuance or renewal of the license the continuation fee set forth in W.S. 26-4-101(a) is paid, a written request for continuation of the license is made to the commissioner on forms prescribed by the commissioner and the licensee remains in compliance with all other applicable provisions of this code."; in (c) added second sentence "A business entity insurance producer or surplus lines broker that allows its license to lapse may, within twelve (12) months from the due date of the continuation fee, reinstate the same license, however, a penalty equal to the amount of the continuation fee shall be required in addition to the continuation fee for any continuation request received after the due date."

The 2022 amendment,

effective January 1, 2023, substituted “A licensee’s” for “An individual insurance producer, adjuster or surplus lines broker” at the beginning of (b); substituted “A licensee” for “An individual insurance producer, adjuster or surplus lines broker” at the beginning of (c); substituted “licensee” for “licensed insurance producer” in the first sentence of (d); and added “, email address” in (f).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.